test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-INTR-POT-yii-tsidiitla_run-away_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - tsídiitł'á[run-away] :
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Pot+SbjSg1:       [tsídíyistł'ò, tsídístł'ò]
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Pot+SbjSg2:       tsídíyíítł'ò
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Pot+SbjSg3:       tsídíítł'ò
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Pot+SbjPl1:       [tsídíyiìtł'ò, tsídíyaàtł'ò]
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Pot+SbjPl1+Distr: [dàtsídíyiìtł'ò, dàtsídíyaàtł'ò]
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Pot+SbjPl2:       tsídíyastł'ò
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Pot+SbjPl2+Distr: dàtsídíyastł'ò
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Pot+SbjPl3:       tsígídíítł'ò
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Pot+SbjPl3+Distr: dàtsígídíítł'ò
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Pot+SbjSg4:       tsíts'ídíítł'ò
    tsídiitł'á[run-away]+V+I+Pot+SbjSg4+Distr: dàtsíts'ídíítł'ò
